Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.533

Construction of RCW 28B.30.530—Conflict with federal requirements.

If any part of RCW 28B.30.530 is found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of RCW 28B.30.530 is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of RCW 28B.30.530 in its application to the agencies concerned.

[ 1984 c 77 s 2.]